Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 2. Indeterminate Sentence

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

21A Am. Jur. 2d Criminal Law § 830; 59 Am. Jur. 2d Pardon and Parole §§ 74, 76 to 80, 82, 83, 85 to 90, 92 to 96, 100, 101, 103 to 114, 118, 119, 121, 122, 124 to 126, 128 to 157.

§ 7-13-201.
Maximum and minimum term.

Except where a term of life is required by law, or as otherwise provided by W.S.

7-13-101

, when a person is sentenced for the commission of a felony, the court imposing the sentence shall not fix a definite term of imprisonment but shall establish a maximum and minimum term within the limits authorized for the statute violated. The maximum term shall not be greater than the maximum provided by law for the statute violated, and the minimum term shall not be less than the minimum provided by law for the statute violated, nor greater than ninety percent (90%) of the maximum term imposed.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 84, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 530; C.S. 1920, § 603; R.S. 1931, § 33-1301; C.S. 1945, § 10-1801; W.S. 1957, § 7-313; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to minimum term of imprisonment in penitentiary, see §

6-10-107

.

Legal sentence. —

Defendant's current sentence was not illegal; the minimum term of defendant's sentence did not exceed 90% of the maximum term, so the sentence complied with this section. Patterson v. State, 2013 WY 153, 314 P.3d 759,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 2013).

Sentencing is not scientific procedure

but rather one on which there is a great divergence of opinion as to proper terms of incarceration. Teton v. State, 482 P.2d 123,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1971).

Wyoming's system of indeterminate sentencing necessitates granting of broad discretion to trial judge,

who must choose from the sentencing alternatives and the range of permissible penalties. Daniel v. State, 644 P.2d 172,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 327

(Wyo. 1982).

Judge to give consideration to all circumstances in imposing sentence. —

In the imposition of a criminal sentence, the judge in exercising his judicial discretion should give consideration to all circumstances, aggravating as well as mitigating. Daniel v. State, 644 P.2d 172,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 327

(Wyo. 1982).

And should explain reasoning. —

Trial judges should explain their reasons for denying probation and indicate the factors they considered in imposing sentence. Daniel v. State, 644 P.2d 172,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 327

(Wyo. 1982).

Reasonableness of sentence. —

In assessing the reasonableness of a criminal sentence, consideration is given to the crime and its circumstances and the character of the criminal. Smith v. State, 922 P.2d 846,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1996).

Illegal sentence. —

Appellant's sentence of 20-22 years for accessory to second degree murder was illegal, because it violated the requirement of this section that the minimum sentence be no more than 90% of the maximum sentence.
Patterson v. State, 2012 WY 90, 279 P.3d 535,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 2012).

Appellate review. —

When the imposition of a criminal sentence by a trial court is within the limits set by the legislature, the sentence will not be overturned, absent a clear abuse of discretion. Smith v. State, 922 P.2d 846,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1996).

There is no statutorily required period of time between minimum and maximum sentences;

nothing, therefore, would preclude the imposition of a sentence providing for only one day between the minimum and maximum sentences. Duffy v. State, 730 P.2d 754,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 655

(Wyo. 1986) (decided prior to 1987 revision of this title).

Double credit for presentence time served unauthorized. —

The trial court's doubling of presentence time served and applying the double credit against the maximum term of sentence was unjustified as well as unauthorized and constituted an abuse of discretion. Jones v. State, 771 P.2d 368,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 1989).

Minimum term not required. —

Former Section 6-63(A) provided that a person who had been convicted of first-degree rape could be sentenced to life in prison and because the district court determined that a life sentence was appropriate, it was not bound to set a minimum term under former Section 7-313 (Section

7-13-201

).
Dolence v. State, 921 P.2d 1103,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1996).

The district court is not required to establish a minimum term where a life sentence is imposed but is not required by statute. Ryan v. State, 988 P.2d 46,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 1999).

Sentence not an abuse of discretion. —

A criminal sentence imposing a term of not less than 18 years nor more than 20 for aggravated vehicular homicide was not an abuse of discretion given the particular set of facts. Smith v. State, 922 P.2d 846,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1996).

Motion for correction of sentence. —

Courts properly denied defendants'
motions for correction of their sentences because defendants were sentenced in accordance with Wyoming's indeterminate sentencing statute and their individual sentences fell within the statutory maximums set out for their crimes. Consequently, there was no obvious violation of the constitutional principles discussed in Apprendi and Blakely.
Gould v. State, 2006 WY 157,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 176

(Dec. 19, 2006).

Applied

in

Williams v. State, 692 P.2d 233,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 352

(Wyo. 1984); Brown v. State, 736 P.2d 1110,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 447

(Wyo. 1987); DeSpain v. State, 865 P.2d 584,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1993); Garcia v. State, 908 P.2d 413,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 223

(Wyo. 1995); Jackson v. State, 2009 WY 82, 209 P.3d 897,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(June 19, 2009); Hathaway v. State, 2017 WY 92, 399 P.3d 625,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 2017).

Quoted

in

Daugherty v. State, 2002 WY 52, 44 P.3d 28,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2002).

Stated

in

Kennedy v. State, 595 P.2d 577,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 413

(Wyo. 1979); Sorenson v. State, 604 P.2d 1031,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 504

(Wyo. 1979); Allman v. State, 677 P.2d 832,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 264

(Wyo. 1984).

Cited

in

Uram v. Roach, 47 Wyo. 335, 37 P.2d 793,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 27

, 95 A.L.R. 1448 (1934); Wlodarczyk v. State, 836 P.2d 279,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 1992); Duffy v. State, 837 P.2d 1047,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 1992); Cardenas v. State, 925 P.2d 239,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1996); Dodge v. State, 951 P.2d 383,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 1997); Dolence v. State, 2005 WY 27, 107 P.3d 176,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(2005); Cothren v. State, 2013 WY 125, 310 P.3d 908,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 130

, 2013 WL 5570284 (Oct 10, 2013); Nicodemus v. Lampert, 2014 WY 135,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Oct. 30, 2014).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Operation of Wyoming Statutes on Probation and Parole,” see 7 Wyo. L.J. 104.

For article, “Disparity and the Sentencing Process in Wyoming District Courts: Recommendations for Change,” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 525 (1976).

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For comment, “Reforming Criminal Sentencing in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 575 (1985).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right to credit on state sentence for time served under sentence of court of separate jurisdiction where state court fails to specify in that regard, 90 ALR3d 408.

Defendant's right to credit for time spent in halfway house, rehabilitation center, or other restrictive environment as condition of probation, 24 ALR4th 789.

Power of state court, during same term, to increase severity of lawful sentence — modern status, 26 ALR4th 905.

United States Parole Commission Guidelines for federal prisoners, 61 ALR Fed 135.